Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-878
Student teacher or intern; terms, defined.

Whenever in sections 79-875 to 79-878 board of education is referred to and the school that a student teacher or intern is referred to does not have a board of education, such term shall be the person or governing body that administers such school.

Laws 1971, LB 175, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,100;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 503.